District of Columbia statutes.
32-1631

Limits on funding Individual Training Accounts.

(a)

Beginning January 1, 2015, or upon the effective date of [D.C. Law 20-263, effective May 2, 2015], whichever occurs first, no eligible training provider shall be eligible to receive funding for more than 5 individual training accounts in a calendar year unless at least 25% of the students participating in the entity’s training programs are funded by sources other than the individual training accounts.

(b)

Beginning January 1, 2016, no eligible training provider shall be eligible to receive funding for more than 5 individual training accounts in a calendar year unless at least 50% of the students participating in the entity’s training programs are funded by sources other than the individual training accounts.

(c)

WIC shall establish a procedure by which eligible training providers shall certify as to:

(1)

The total number of students enrolled in the eligible training provider’s training programs;

(2)

The number of students who are funded by sources other than individual training accounts; and

(3)

The percentage calculated using the number in paragraph (1) of this subsection as the denominator and the number in paragraph (2) of this subsection as the numerator.

(d)

For the purposes of this section, the term:

(1)

“Eligible training provider” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-1602(1A).

(2)

“Individual training account” shall have the same meaning as provided § 32-1602(1B).

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 1142, 51 DCR 8441
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-263, § 3(a), (b)(1), (c), 62 DCR 1518
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-263 rewrote (a) to (c); and added (d).
For temporary (90 day) workforce investment implementation individual training accounts limitation provisions, see § 1142 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) workforce investment implementation individual training accounts limitation provisions, see § 1142 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
Short title of subtitle M of title I of Law 15-205: Section 1141 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle M of title I of the act may be cited as the Workforce Investment Implementation Individual Training Accounts Limitation Amendment Act of 2004.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-263: Section 3(b)(2) of D.C. Law 20-263 provided that § 3(b)(1) of the act, which amended subsection (c) of this section, shall apply as of October 1, 2014.